Nevada, session 83, AB230.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 637B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate
Compact is hereby ratified and entered into with all other
jurisdictions legally joining the Compact, in substantially the form
set forth in this section:
AUDIOLOGY AND SPEECH-LANGUAGE
PATHOLOGY INTERSTATE COMPACT
SECTION 1. PURPOSE
The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate practice
of audiology and speech-language pathology with the goal of
improving public access to audiology and speech-language
pathology services. The practice of audiology and speech-
language pathology occurs in the state where the
patient/client/student is located at the time of the
patient/client/student encounter. The Compact preserves
the regulatory authority of states to protect public health and
safety through the current system of state licensure.
This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
1. Increase public access to audiology and speech-language
pathology services by providing for the mutual recognition of
other member state licenses;
2. Enhance the states’ ability to protect the public’s health
and safety;
3. Encourage the cooperation of member states in regulating
multistate audiology and speech-language pathology practice;
4. Support spouses of relocating active duty military
personnel;
5. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative and
disciplinary information between member states;
6. Allow a remote state to hold a provider of services with a
compact privilege in that state accountable to that state’s practice
standards; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
7. Allow for the use of telehealth technology to facilitate
increased access to audiology and speech-language pathology
services.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the
following definitions shall apply:
A. “Active duty military” means full-time duty status in the
active uniformed service of the United States, including members
of the National Guard and Reserve on active duty orders pursuant
to 10 U.S.C. Chapter 1209 and 1211.
B. “Adverse action” means any administrative, civil,
equitable or criminal action permitted by a state’s laws which is
imposed by a licensing board or other authority against an
audiologist or speech-language pathologist, including actions
against an individual’s license or privilege to practice such as
revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, or
restriction on the licensee’s practice.
C. “Alternative program” means a non-disciplinary
monitoring process approved by an audiology or speech-language
pathology licensing board to address impaired practitioners.
D. “Audiologist” means an individual who is licensed by a
state to practice audiology.
E. “Audiology” means the care and services provided by a
licensed audiologist as set forth in the member state’s statutes and
rules.
F. “Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Compact
Commission” or “Commission” means the national administrative
body whose membership consists of all states that have enacted the
Compact.
G. “Audiology and speech-language pathology licensing
board,” “audiology licensing board,” “speech-language pathology
licensing board,” or “licensing board” means the agency of a state
that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of audiologists
and/or speech-language pathologists.
H. “Compact privilege” means the authorization granted by a
remote state to allow a licensee from another member state to
practice as an audiologist or speech-language pathologist in the
remote state under its laws and rules. The practice of audiology or
speech-language pathology occurs in the member state where the
patient/client/student is located at the time of the
patient/client/student encounter.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
I. “Current significant investigative information” means
investigative information that a licensing board, after an inquiry
or investigation that includes notification and an opportunity for
the audiologist or speech-language pathologist to respond, if
required by state law, has reason to believe is not groundless and,
if proved true, would indicate more than a minor infraction.
J. “Data system” means a repository of information about
licensees, including, but not limited to, continuing education,
examination, licensure, investigative, compact privilege and
adverse action.
K. “Encumbered license” means a license in which an
adverse action restricts the practice of audiology or speech-
language pathology by the licensee and said adverse action has
been reported to the National Practitioners Data Bank (NPDB).
L. “Executive Committee” means a group of directors elected
or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to
them by, the Commission.
M. “Home state” means the member state that is the
licensee’s primary state of residence.
N. “Impaired practitioner” means individuals whose
professional practice is adversely affected by substance abuse,
addiction, or other health-related conditions.
O. “Licensee” means an individual who currently holds an
authorization from the state licensing board to practice as an
audiologist or speech-language pathologist.
P. “Member state” means a state that has enacted the
Compact.
Q. “Privilege to practice” means a legal authorization
permitting the practice of audiology or speech-language pathology
in a remote state.
R. “Remote state” means a member state other than the home
state where a licensee is exercising or seeking to exercise the
compact privilege.
S. “Rule” means a regulation, principle or directive
promulgated by the Commission that has the force of law.
T. “Single-state license” means an audiology or speech-
language pathology license issued by a member state that
authorizes practice only within the issuing state and does not
include a privilege to practice in any other member state.
U. “Speech-language pathologist” means an individual who
is licensed by a state to practice speech-language pathology.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
V. “Speech-language pathology” means the care and services
provided by a licensed speech-language pathologist as set forth in
the member state’s statutes and rules.
W. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district or
territory of the United States of America that regulates the practice
of audiology and speech-language pathology.
X. “State practice laws” means a member state’s laws, rules
and regulations that govern the practice of audiology or speech-
language pathology, define the scope of audiology or speech-
language pathology practice, and create the methods and grounds
for imposing discipline.
Y. “Telehealth” means the application of telecommunication
technology to deliver audiology or speech-language pathology
services at a distance for assessment, intervention and/or
consultation.
SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. A license issued to an audiologist or speech-language
pathologist by a home state to a resident in that state shall be
recognized by each member state as authorizing an audiologist or
speech-language pathologist to practice audiology or speech-
language pathology, under a privilege to practice, in each member
state.
B. A state must implement or utilize procedures for
considering the criminal history records of applicants for initial
privilege to practice. These procedures shall include the
submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information
by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal
history record information from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state’s
criminal records.
1. A member state must fully implement a criminal
background check requirement, within a time frame established by
rule, by receiving the results of the Federal Bureau of
Investigation record search on criminal background checks and
use the results in making licensure decisions.
2. Communication between a member state, the
Commission and among member states regarding the verification
of eligibility for licensure through the Compact shall not include
any information received from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation relating to a federal criminal records check
performed by a member state under Public Law 92-544.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
C. Upon application for a privilege to practice, the licensing
board in the issuing remote state shall ascertain, through the data
system, whether the applicant has ever held, or is the holder of, a
license issued by any other state, whether there are any
encumbrances on any license or privilege to practice held by the
applicant, whether any adverse action has been taken against any
license or privilege to practice held by the applicant.
D. Each member state shall require an applicant to obtain or
retain a license in the home state and meet the home state’s
qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as, all
other applicable state laws.
E. For an audiologist:
1. Must meet one of the following educational
requirements:
a. On or before, Dec. 31, 2007, has graduated with a
master’s degree or doctorate in audiology, or equivalent degree
regardless of degree name, from a program that is accredited by
an accrediting agency recognized by the Council for Higher
Education Accreditation, or its successor, or by the United States
Department of Education and operated by a college or university
accredited by a regional or national accrediting organization
recognized by the board; or
b. On or after, Jan. 1, 2008, has graduated with a
Doctoral degree in audiology, or equivalent degree, regardless of
degree name, from a program that is accredited by an accrediting
agency recognized by the Council for Higher Education
Accreditation, or its successor, or by the United States Department
of Education and operated by a college or university accredited by
a regional or national accrediting organization recognized by the
board; or
c. Has graduated from an audiology program that is
housed in an institution of higher education outside of the United
States (a) for which the program and institution have been
approved by the authorized accrediting body in the applicable
country and (b) the degree program has been verified by an
independent credentials review agency to be comparable to a state
licensing board-approved program.
2. Has completed a supervised clinical practicum
experience from an accredited educational institution or its
cooperating programs as required by the Commission;
3. Has successfully passed a national examination
approved by the Commission;
4. Holds an active, unencumbered license;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
5. Has not been convicted or found guilty, and has not
entered into an agreed disposition, of a felony related to the
practice of audiology, under applicable state or federal criminal
law;
6. Has a valid United States Social Security or National
Practitioner Identification number.
F. For a speech-language pathologist:
1. Must meet one of the following educational
requirements:
a. Has graduated with a master’s degree from a speech-
language pathology program that is accredited by an organization
recognized by the United States Department of Education and
operated by a college or university accredited by a regional or
national accrediting organization recognized by the board; or
b. Has graduated from a speech-language pathology
program that is housed in an institution of higher education
outside of the United States (a) for which the program and
institution have been approved by the authorized accrediting body
in the applicable country and (b) the degree program has been
verified by an independent credentials review agency to be
comparable to a state licensing board-approved program.
2. Has completed a supervised clinical practicum
experience from an educational institution or its cooperating
programs as required by the Commission;
3. Has completed a supervised postgraduate professional
experience as required by the Commission;
4. Has successfully passed a national examination
approved by the Commission;
5. Holds an active, unencumbered license;
6. Has not been convicted or found guilty, and has not
entered into an agreed disposition, of a felony related to the
practice of speech-language pathology, under applicable state or
federal criminal law;
7. Has a valid United States Social Security or National
Practitioner Identification number.
G. The privilege to practice is derived from the home state
license.
H. An audiologist or speech-language pathologist practicing
in a member state must comply with the state practice laws of the
state in which the client is located at the time service is provided.
The practice of audiology and speech-language pathology shall
include all audiology and speech-language pathology practice as
defined by the state practice laws of the member state in which the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
client is located. The practice of audiology and speech-language
pathology in a member state under a privilege to practice shall
subject an audiologist or speech-language pathologist to the
jurisdiction of the licensing board, the courts and the laws of the
member state in which the client is located at the time service is
provided.
I. Individuals not residing in a member state shall continue to
be able to apply for a member state’s single-state license as
provided under the laws of each member state. However, the
single-state license granted to these individuals shall not be
recognized as granting the privilege to practice audiology or
speech-language pathology in any other member state. Nothing in
this Compact shall affect the requirements established by a
member state for the issuance of a single-state license.
J. Member states may charge a fee for granting a compact
privilege.
K. Member states must comply with the bylaws and rules and
regulations of the Commission.
SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE
A. To exercise the compact privilege under the terms and
provisions of the Compact, the audiologist or speech-language
pathologist shall:
1. Hold an active license in the home state;
2. Have no encumbrance on any state license;
3. Be eligible for a compact privilege in any member state
in accordance with Section 3;
4. Have not had any adverse action against any license or
compact privilege within the previous 2 years from date of
application;
5. Notify the Commission that the licensee is seeking the
compact privilege within a remote state(s);
6. Pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, for the
compact privilege;
7. Report to the Commission adverse action taken by any
non-member state within 30 days from the date the adverse action
is taken.
B. For the purposes of the compact privilege, an audiologist
or speech-language pathologist shall only hold one home state
license at a time.
C. Except as provided in Section 6, if an audiologist or
speech-language pathologist changes primary state of residence by
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
moving between two-member states, the audiologist or speech-
language pathologist must apply for licensure in the new home
state, and the license issued by the prior home state shall be
deactivated in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the
Commission.
D. The audiologist or speech-language pathologist may apply
for licensure in advance of a change in primary state of residence.
E. A license shall not be issued by the new home state until
the audiologist or speech-language pathologist provides
satisfactory evidence of a change in primary state of residence to
the new home state and satisfies all applicable requirements to
obtain a license from the new home state.
F. If an audiologist or speech-language pathologist changes
primary state of residence by moving from a member state to a
non-member state, the license issued by the prior home state shall
convert to a single-state license, valid only in the former home
state.
G. The compact privilege is valid until the expiration date of
the home state license. The licensee must comply with the
requirements of Section 4A to maintain the compact privilege in
the remote state.
H. A licensee providing audiology or speech-language
pathology services in a remote state under the compact privilege
shall function within the laws and regulations of the remote state.
I. A licensee providing audiology or speech-language
pathology services in a remote state is subject to that state’s
regulatory authority. A remote state may, in accordance with due
process and that state’s laws, remove a licensee’s compact
privilege in the remote state for a specific period of time, impose
fines, and/or take any other necessary actions to protect the health
and safety of its citizens.
J. If a home state license is encumbered, the licensee shall
lose the compact privilege in any remote state until the following
occur:
1. The home state license is no longer encumbered; and
2. Two years have elapsed from the date of the adverse
action.
K. Once an encumbered license in the home state is restored
to good standing, the licensee must meet the requirements of
Section 4A to obtain a compact privilege in any remote state.
L. Once the requirements of Section 4J have been met, the
licensee must meet the requirements in Section 4A to obtain a
compact privilege in a remote state.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
SECTION 5. COMPACT PRIVILEGE
TO PRACTICE TELEHEALTH
Member states shall recognize the right of an audiologist or
speech-language pathologist, licensed by a home state in
accordance with Section 3 and under rules promulgated by the
Commission, to practice audiology or speech-language pathology
in any member state via telehealth under a privilege to practice as
provided in the Compact and rules promulgated by the
Commission.
SECTION 6. ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY
PERSONNEL OR THEIR SPOUSES
Active duty military personnel, or their spouse, shall designate
a home state where the individual has a current license in good
standing. The individual may retain the home state designation
during the period the service member is on active duty.
Subsequent to designating a home state, the individual shall only
change their home state through application for licensure in the
new state.
SECTION 7. ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a
remote state shall have the authority, in accordance with existing
state due process law, to:
1. Take adverse action against an audiologist’s or speech-
language pathologist’s privilege to practice within that member
state.
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations
that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as
the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a licensing board
in a member state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or
the production of evidence from another member state shall be
enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction,
according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to
subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing
authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and
other fees required by the service statutes of the state in which the
witnesses or evidence are located.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
3. Only the home state shall have the power to take adverse
action against a audiologist’s or speech-language pathologist’s
license issued by the home state.
B. For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state shall
give the same priority and effect to reported conduct received from
a member state as it would if the conduct had occurred within the
home state. In so doing, the home state shall apply its own state
laws to determine appropriate action.
C. The home state shall complete any pending investigations
of an audiologist or speech-language pathologist who changes
primary state of residence during the course of the investigations.
The home state shall also have the authority to take appropriate
action(s) and shall promptly report the conclusions of the
investigations to the administrator of the data system. The
administrator of the coordinated licensure information system
shall promptly notify the new home state of any adverse actions.
D. If otherwise permitted by state law, the member state may
recover from the affected audiologist or speech-language
pathologist the costs of investigations and disposition of cases
resulting from any adverse action taken against that audiologist or
speech-language pathologist.
E. The member state may take adverse action based on the
factual findings of the remote state, provided that the member
state follows the member state’s own procedures for taking the
adverse action.
F. Joint Investigations
1. In addition to the authority granted to a member state by
its respective audiology or speech-language pathology practice act
or other applicable state law, any member state may participate
with other member states in joint investigations of licensees.
2. Member states shall share any investigative, litigation, or
compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual
investigation initiated under the Compact.
G. If adverse action is taken by the home state against an
audiologist’s or speech-language pathologist’s license, the
audiologist’s or speech-language pathologist’s privilege to practice
in all other member states shall be deactivated until all
encumbrances have been removed from the state license. All home
state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action against an
audiologist’s or speech-language pathologist’s license shall
include a statement that the audiologist’s or speech-language
pathologist’s privilege to practice is deactivated in all member
states during the pendency of the order.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
H. If a member state takes adverse action, it shall promptly
notify the administrator of the data system. The administrator of
the data system shall promptly notify the home state of any adverse
actions by remote states.
I. Nothing in this Compact shall override a member state’s
decision that participation in an alternative program may be used
in lieu of adverse action.
SECTION 8. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE
AUDIOLOGY AND SPEECH-LANGUAGE
PATHOLOGY COMPACT COMMISSION
A. The Compact member states hereby create and establish a
joint public agency known as the Audiology and Speech-Language
Pathology Compact Commission:
1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact
states.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against
the Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court
of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to
participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a
waiver of sovereign immunity.
B. Membership, Voting and Meetings
1. Each member state shall have two (2) delegates selected
by that member state’s licensing board. The delegates shall be
current members of the licensing board. One shall be an
audiologist and one shall be a speech-language pathologist.
2. An additional five (5) delegates, who are either a public
member or board administrator from a state licensing board, shall
be chosen by the Executive Committee from a pool of nominees
provided by the Commission at Large.
3. Any delegate may be removed or suspended from office
as provided by the law of the state from which the delegate is
appointed.
4. The member state board shall fill any vacancy occurring
on the Commission, within 90 days.
5. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote with
regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and
shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business
and affairs of the Commission.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
6. A delegate shall vote in person or by other means as
provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates’
participation in meetings by telephone or other means of
communication.
7. The Commission shall meet at least once during each
calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the
bylaws.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers and
duties:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish bylaws;
3. Establish a Code of Ethics;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the
bylaws;
5. Meet and take actions as are consistent with the
provisions of this Compact and the bylaws;
6. Promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate
implementation and administration of this Compact. The rules
shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all
member states;
7. Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the
name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any state
audiology or speech-language pathology licensing board to sue or
be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a member state;
10. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix
compensation, define duties, grant individuals appropriate
authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact, and to
establish the Commission’s personnel policies and programs
relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and
other related personnel matters;
11. Accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of
money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to receive,
utilize and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the
Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety and/or
conflict of interest;
12. Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations
of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any property, real,
personal or mixed; provided that at all times the Commission shall
avoid any appearance of impropriety;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
13. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange,
abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or
mixed;
14. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
15. Borrow money;
16. Appoint committees, including standing committees
composed of members, and other interested persons as may be
designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
17. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate
with, law enforcement agencies;
18. Establish and elect an Executive Committee; and
19. Perform other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact consistent
with the state regulation of audiology and speech-language
pathology licensure and practice.
D. The Executive Committee
The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf
of the Commission according to the terms of this Compact:
1. The Executive Committee shall be composed of ten (10)
members:
a. Seven (7) voting members who are elected by the
Commission from the current membership of the Commission;
b. Two (2) ex-officios, consisting of one nonvoting
member from a recognized national audiology professional
association and one nonvoting member from a recognized
national speech-language pathology association; and
c. One (1) ex-officio, nonvoting member from the
recognized membership organization of the audiology and speech-
language pathology licensing boards.
E. The ex-officio members shall be selected by their
respective organizations.
1. The Commission may remove any member of the
Executive Committee as provided in bylaws.
2. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
3. The Executive Committee shall have the following duties
and responsibilities:
a. Recommend to the entire Commission changes to the
rules or bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees paid by
Compact member states such as annual dues, and any commission
Compact fee charged to licensees for the compact privilege;
b. Ensure Compact administration services are
appropriately provided, contractual or otherwise;
c. Prepare and recommend the budget;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
d. Maintain financial records on behalf of the
Commission;
e. Monitor Compact compliance of member states and
provide compliance reports to the Commission;
f. Establish additional committees as necessary; and
g. Other duties as provided in rules or bylaws.
4. Meetings of the Commission
All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of
meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the
rulemaking provisions in Section 10.
5. The Commission or the Executive Committee or other
committees of the Commission may convene in a closed, non-
public meeting if the Commission or Executive Committee or
other committees of the Commission must discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a member state with its
obligations under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or
other matters related to the Commission’s internal personnel
practices and procedures;
c. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
d. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or
sale of goods, services, or real estate;
e. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
any person;
f. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial
information that is privileged or confidential;
g. Disclosure of information of a personal nature where
disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of
personal privacy;
h. Disclosure of investigative records compiled for law
enforcement purposes;
i. Disclosure of information related to any investigative
reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Commission
or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or
determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact; or
j. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
federal or member state statute.
6. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant
to this provision, the Commission’s legal counsel or designee shall
certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each
relevant exempting provision.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
7. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and
clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall
provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed.
All documents considered in connection with an action shall be
identified in minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed
meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority
vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
8. Financing of the Commission
a. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the
payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment,
organization, and ongoing activities.
b. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate
revenue sources, donations, and grants of money, equipment,
supplies, materials, and services.
c. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual
assessment from each member state or impose fees on other
parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the
Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount
sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for
which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate
annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a
formula to be determined by the Commission, which shall
promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.
9. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind
prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall
the Commission pledge the credit of any of the member states,
except by and with the authority of the member state.
10. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the
Commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting
procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and
disbursements of funds handled by the Commission shall be
audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the
report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the
annual report of the Commission.
F. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any
claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other
civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
error or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom
the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed to protect any person from suit and/or liability for any
damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer,
executive director, employee or representative of the Commission
in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any
actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or
that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable
basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing
herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining
his or her own counsel; and provided further, that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any
member, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of
the Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment
obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that person
had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that
the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
SECTION 9. DATA SYSTEM
A. The Commission shall provide for the development,
maintenance, and utilization of a coordinated database and
reporting system containing licensure, adverse action, and
investigative information on all licensed individuals in member
states.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the
contrary, a member state shall submit a uniform data set to the
data system on all individuals to whom this Compact is applicable
as required by the rules of the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
3. Adverse actions against a license or compact privilege;
4. Non-confidential information related to alternative
program participation;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s)
for denial; and
6. Other information that may facilitate the administration
of this Compact, as determined by the rules of the Commission.
C. Investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any
member state shall only be available to other member states.
D. The Commission shall promptly notify all member states
of any adverse action taken against a licensee or an individual
applying for a license. Adverse action information pertaining to a
licensee in any member state shall be available to any other
member state.
E. Member states contributing information to the data system
may designate information that may not be shared with the public
without the express permission of the contributing state.
F. Any information submitted to the data system that is
subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the member
state contributing the information shall be removed from the data
system.
SECTION 10. RULEMAKING
A. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers
pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Section and the rules
adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become binding
as of the date specified in each rule or amendment.
B. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states
rejects a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same
manner used to adopt the Compact within 4 years of the date of
adoption of the rule, the rule shall have no further force and effect
in any member state.
C. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a
regular or special meeting of the Commission.
D. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules
by the Commission, and at least thirty (30) days in advance of the
meeting at which the rule shall be considered and voted upon, the
Commission shall file a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly
accessible platform; and
2. On the website of each member state audiology or
speech-language pathology licensing board or other publicly
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
accessible platform or the publication in which each state would
otherwise publish proposed rules.
E. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
1. The proposed time, date, and location of the meeting in
which the rule shall be considered and voted upon;
2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the
reason for the proposed rule;
3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any
interested person; and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit
notice to the Commission of their intention to attend the public
hearing and any written comments.
F. Prior to the adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission
shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions and
arguments, which shall be made available to the public.
G. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public
hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment if a hearing is
requested by:
1. At least twenty-five (25) persons;
2. A state or federal governmental subdivision or agency;
or
3. An association having at least twenty-five (25) members.
H. If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment,
the Commission shall publish the place, time, and date of the
scheduled public hearing. If the hearing is held via electronic
means, the Commission shall publish the mechanism for access to
the electronic hearing.
1. All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall
notify the executive director of the Commission or other
designated member in writing of their desire to appear and testify
at the hearing not less than five (5) business days before the
scheduled date of the hearing.
2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each
person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity
to comment orally or in writing.
3. All hearings shall be recorded. A copy of the recording
shall be made available on request.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the
convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this
section.
I. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of
business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral comments
received.
J. If no written notice of intent to attend the public hearing
by interested parties is received, the Commission may proceed with
promulgation of the proposed rule without a public hearing.
K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members,
take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the
effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record
and the full text of the rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the
Commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without
prior notice, opportunity for comment, or hearing, provided that
the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in
this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as
reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after
the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an
emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order
to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds; or
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an
administrative rule that is established by federal law or rule.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the
Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or
amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors
in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public
notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the
Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any
person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision
may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a
material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing
and delivered to the chair of the Commission prior to the end of
the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision shall take
effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the
revision may not take effect without the approval of the
Commission.
SECTION 11. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE
RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Dispute Resolution
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
1. Upon request by a member state, the Commission shall
attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise
among member states and between member and non-member
states.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for
both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as
appropriate.
B. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its
discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this Compact.
2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal
action in the United States District Court for the District of
Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices against a member state in default to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its
promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is
necessary, the prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of
litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies
of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other
remedies available under federal or state law.
SECTION 12. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION
OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR
AUDIOLOGY AND SPEECH-LANGUAGE
PATHOLOGY PRACTICE AND ASSOCIATED
RULES, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which
the Compact statute is enacted into law in the 10th member state.
The provisions, which become effective at that time, shall be
limited to the powers granted to the Commission relating to
assembly and the promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the
Commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking powers necessary
to the implementation and administration of the Compact.
B. Any state that joins the Compact subsequent to the
Commission’s initial adoption of the rules shall be subject to the
rules as they exist on the date on which the Compact becomes law
in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the
Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day
the Compact becomes law in that state.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
C. Any member state may withdraw from this Compact by
enacting a statute repealing the same.
1. A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until
six (6) months after enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement
of the withdrawing state’s audiology or speech-language
pathology licensing board to comply with the investigative and
adverse action reporting requirements of this act prior to the
effective date of withdrawal.
D. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any audiology or speech-language pathology
licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a
member state and a non-member state that does not conflict with
the provisions of this Compact.
E. This Compact may be amended by the member states. No
amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding
upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all
member states.
SECTION 13. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate
the purposes thereof. The provisions of this Compact shall be
severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this
Compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any
member state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to
any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid,
the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability
thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall
not be affected thereby. If this Compact shall be held contrary to
the constitution of any member state, the Compact shall remain in
full force and effect as to the remaining member states and in full
force and effect as to the member state affected as to all severable
matters.
SECTION 14. BINDING EFFECT OF
COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS
A. Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law
of a member state that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
B. All laws in a member state in conflict with the Compact
are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
C. All lawful actions of the Commission, including all rules
and bylaws promulgated by the Commission, are binding upon the
member states.
D. All agreements between the Commission and the member
states are binding in accordance with their terms.
E. In the event any provision of the Compact exceeds the
constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member
state, the provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict
with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.
Sec. 2. NRS 637B.288 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.288 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 239.0115 [,] and section 1 of this act, a complaint filed with
the Board, all documents and other information filed with the
complaint and all documents and other information compiled as a
result of an investigation conducted to determine whether to initiate
disciplinary action against a person are confidential, unless the
person submits a written statement to the Board requesting that such
documents and information be made public records.
2. The charging documents filed with the Board to initiate
disciplinary action pursuant to chapter 622A of NRS and all
documents and information considered by the Board when
determining whether to impose discipline are public records.
3. The Board shall, to the extent feasible, communicate or
cooperate with or provide any documents or other information to
any other licensing board or any other agency that is investigating a
person, including, without limitation, a law enforcement agency.
Sec. 3. The preliminary chapter of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
Except as otherwise expressly provided in a particular statute
or required by the context, privilege to practice as an audiologist
or speech-language pathologist in this State under the Audiology
and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact ratified and
entered into in section 1 of this act shall be deemed to be
equivalent to the corresponding license.
Sec. 4. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 1 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)